Utah statutes.
77-27-21.5.   Sex and kidnap offenders -- Registration -- Information system
-- Law enforcement and courts to report -- Penalty -- Effect of expungement.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Business day" means a day on which state offices are open for regular
business.
(b)  "Department" means the Department of Corrections.
(c)  "Division" means the Division of Juvenile Justice Services.
(d)  "Employed" or "carries on a vocation" includes employment that is full
time or part time, whether financially compensated, volunteered, or for the
purpose of government or educational benefit.
(e)  "Indian Country" means:
(i)  all land within the limits of any Indian reservation under the
jurisdiction of the United States government, regardless of the issuance of
any patent, and includes rights-of-way running through the reservation;
(ii)  all dependent Indian communities within the borders of the United States
whether within the original or subsequently acquired territory, and whether or
not within the limits of a state; and
(iii)  all Indian allotments, including the Indian allotments to which the
Indian titles to have not been extinguished, including rights-of-way running
through the allotments.
(f)  "Jurisdiction" means any state, Indian Country, or United States
Territory.
(g)  "Kidnap offender" means any person other than a natural parent of the
victim who:
(i)  has been convicted in this state of a violation of:
(A)  Section 76-5-301, kidnapping;
(B)  Section 76-5-301.1, child kidnapping;
(C)  Section 76-5-302, aggravated kidnapping; or
(D)  attempting, soliciting, or conspiring to commit any felony offense listed
in Subsections (1)(g)(i)(A) through (C);
(ii)  has been convicted of any crime, or an attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy to commit a crime in another jurisdiction that is substantially
equivalent to the offenses listed in Subsection (1)(g)(i) and who is:
(A)  a Utah resident; or
(B)  not a Utah resident, but who, in any 12 month period, is in this state
for a total of 10 or more days, regardless of whether or not the offender
intends to permanently reside in this state;
(iii)  is required to register as an offender in any other jurisdiction, and
who, in any 12 month period, is in this state for a total of 10 or more days,
regardless of whether or not the offender intends to permanently reside in
this state;
(iv)  is a nonresident regularly employed or working in this state, or who is
a student in this state, and was convicted of one or more offenses listed in
Subsection (1)(g), or any substantially equivalent offense in another
jurisdiction, or as a result of the conviction, is required to register in the
person's state of residence;
(v)  is found not guilty by reason of insanity in this state or in any other
jurisdiction of one or more offenses listed in Subsection (1)(g); or
(vi)  is adjudicated delinquent based on one or more offenses listed in
Subsection (1)(g)(i) and who has been committed to the division for secure
confinement and remains in the division's custody 30 days prior to the
person's 21st birthday.
(h)  "Natural parent" means a minor's biological or adoptive parent, and
includes the minor's noncustodial parent.
(i)  "Offender" means a kidnap offender as defined in Subsection (1)(g) or a
sex offender as defined in Subsection (1)(n).
(j)  "Online identifier" or "Internet identifier":
(i)  means any electronic mail, chat, instant messenger, social networking, or
similar name used for Internet communication; and
(ii)  does not include date of birth, Social Security number, PIN number, or
Internet passwords.
(k)  "Primary residence" means the location where the offender regularly
resides, even if the offender intends to move to another location or return to
another location at any future date.
(l)  "Register" means to comply with the requirements of this section and
administrative rules of the department made under this section.
(m)  "Secondary residence" means any real property that the offender owns or
has a financial interest in, and any location where, in any 12 month period,
the offender stays overnight a total of 10 or more nights when not staying at
the offender's primary residence.
(n)  "Sex offender" means any person:
(i)  convicted in this state of:
(A)  a felony or class A misdemeanor violation of Section 76-4-401, enticing a
minor;
(B)  a felony or class A misdemeanor violation of Section 76-9-702.7,
voyeurism;
(C)  a felony violation of Section 76-5-401, unlawful sexual activity with a
minor;
(D)  Section 76-5-401.1, sexual abuse of a minor;
(E)  Section 76-5-401.2, unlawful sexual conduct with a 16 or 17 year old;
(F)  Section 76-5-402, rape;
(G)  Section 76-5-402.1, rape of a child;
(H)  Section 76-5-402.2, object rape;
(I)  Section 76-5-402.3, object rape of a child;
(J)  a felony violation of Section 76-5-403, forcible sodomy;
(K)  Section 76-5-403.1, sodomy on a child;
(L)  Section 76-5-404, forcible sexual abuse;
(M)  Section 76-5-404.1, sexual abuse of a child or aggravated sexual abuse of
a child;
(N)  Section 76-5-405, aggravated sexual assault;
(O)  Section 76-5a-3, sexual exploitation of a minor;
(P)  Section 76-7-102, incest;
(Q)  Subsection 76-9-702(1), lewdness, if the person has been convicted of the
offense four or more times;
(R)  Subsection 76-9-702(3), sexual battery, if the person has been convicted
of the offense four or more times;
(S)  any combination of convictions of Subsection 76-9-702(1), lewdness, and
of Subsection 76-9-702(3), sexual battery, that total four or more
convictions;
(T)  Section 76-9-702.5, lewdness involving a child;
(U)  Section 76-10-1306, aggravated exploitation of prostitution; or
(V)  attempting, soliciting, or conspiring to commit any felony offense listed
in Subsection (1)(n)(i);
(ii)  who has been convicted of any crime, or an attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy to commit a crime in another jurisdiction that is substantially
equivalent to the offenses listed in Subsection (1)(n)(i) and who is:
(A)  a Utah resident; or
(B)  not a Utah resident, but who, in any 12 month period, is in this state
for a total of 10 or more days, regardless of whether the offender intends to
permanently reside in this state;
(iii)  who is required to register as an offender in any other jurisdiction,
and who, in any 12 month period, is in the state for a total of 10 or more
days, regardless of whether or not the offender intends to permanently reside
in this state;
(iv)  who is a nonresident regularly employed or working in this state or who
is a student in this state and was convicted of one or more offenses listed in
Subsection (1)(n)(i), or any substantially equivalent offense in any
jurisdiction, or as a result of the conviction, is required to register in the
person's jurisdiction of residence;
(v)  who is found not guilty by reason of insanity in this state, or in any
other jurisdiction of one or more offenses listed in Subsection (1)(n)(i); or
(vi)  who is adjudicated delinquent based on one or more offenses listed in
Subsection (1)(n)(i) and who has been committed to the division for secure
confinement and remains in the division's custody 30 days prior to the
person's 21st birthday.
(o)  "Vehicle" means any motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft subject to
registration in any jurisdiction.
(2)  The department, to assist in investigating sex-related crimes and in
apprehending offenders, shall:
(a)  develop and operate a system to collect, analyze, maintain, and
disseminate information on offenders and sex and kidnap offenses;
(b)  make information listed in Subsection (27) available to the public; and
(c)  share information provided by an offender under this section that may not
be made available to the public under Subsection (27), but only:
(i)  for the purposes under this Subsection (2); or
(ii)  in accordance with Section 63G-2-206.
(3)  Any law enforcement agency shall, in the manner prescribed by the
department, inform the department of:
(a)  the receipt of a report or complaint of an offense listed in Subsection
(1)(g) or (n), within three business days; and
(b)  the arrest of a person suspected of any of the offenses listed in
Subsection (1)(g) or (n), within five business days.
(4)  Upon convicting a person of any of the offenses listed in Subsection
(1)(g) or (n), the convicting court shall within three business days forward a
copy of the judgment and sentence to the department.
(5)  An offender in the custody of the department shall be registered by
agents of the department upon:
(a)  placement on probation;
(b)  commitment to a secure correctional facility operated by or under
contract to the department;
(c)  release from confinement to parole status, termination or expiration of
sentence, or escape;
(d)  entrance to and release from any community-based residential program
operated by or under contract to the department; or
(e)  termination of probation or parole.
(6)  An offender who is not in the custody of the department and who is
confined in a correctional facility not operated by or under contract to the
department shall be registered with the department by the sheriff of the
county in which the offender is confined, upon:
(a)  commitment to the correctional facility; and
(b)  release from confinement.
(7)  An offender in the custody of the division shall be registered with the
department by the division prior to release from custody.
(8)  An offender committed to a state mental hospital shall be registered with
the department by the hospital upon admission and upon discharge.
(9) (a) (i)  A municipal or county law enforcement agency shall register an
offender who resides within the agency's jurisdiction and is not under the
supervision of the Division of Adult Probation and Parole within the
department.
(ii)  In order to conduct offender registration under this section, the agency
shall ensure the agency staff responsible for registration:
(A)  has received initial training by the department and has been certified by
the department as qualified and authorized to conduct registrations and enter
offender registration information into the registry database; and
(B)  certify annually with the department.
(b) (i)  When the department receives offender registration information
regarding a change of an offender's primary residence location, the department
shall within five days electronically notify the law enforcement agencies that
have jurisdiction over the area where:
(A)  the residence that the offender is leaving is located; and
(B)  the residence to which the offender is moving is located.
(ii)  The department shall provide notification under this Subsection (9)(b)
if the offender's change of address is between law enforcement agency
jurisdictions, or is within one jurisdiction.
(c)  The department shall make available to offenders required to register
under this section the name of the agency, whether it is a local law
enforcement agency or the department, that the offender should contact to
register, the location for registering, and the requirements of registration.
(10)  An offender convicted by any other jurisdiction is required to register
under Subsection (1)(g) or (n) and Subsection (12) and shall register with the
department within 10 days of entering the state, regardless of the offender's
length of stay.
(11) (a)  An offender required to register under Subsection (1)(g) or (n) who
is under supervision by the department shall register with Division of Adult
Probation and Parole.
(b)  An offender required to register under Subsection (1)(g) or (n) who is no
longer under supervision by the department shall register with the police
department or sheriff's office that has jurisdiction over the area where the
offender resides.
(12) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (12)(b), (c), and (d), an offender
shall, for the duration of the sentence and for 10 years after termination of
sentence or custody of the division, register every year during the month of
the offender's birth, during the month that is the sixth month after the
offender's birth month, and also within three business days of every change of
the offender's primary residence, any secondary residences, place of
employment, vehicle information, or educational information required to be
submitted under Subsection (14).
(b)  Except as provided Subsections (12)(c) and (d), an offender who is
convicted in another jurisdiction of an offense listed in Subsection (1)(g)(i)
or (n)(i), a substantially similar offense, or any other offense that requires
registration in the jurisdiction of conviction, shall:
(i)  register for the time period, and in the frequency, required by the
jurisdiction where the offender was convicted if that jurisdiction's
registration period or registration frequency requirement for the offense that
the offender was convicted of is greater than the 10 years from completion of
the sentence registration period that is required under Subsection (12)(a), or
is more frequent than every six months; or
(ii)  register in accordance with the requirements of Subsection (12)(a), if
the jurisdiction's registration period or frequency requirement for the
offense that the offender was convicted of is less than the registration
period required under Subsection (12)(a), or is less frequent than every six
months.
(c) (i) (A)  An offender convicted as an adult of any of the offenses listed
in Subsection (12)(c)(ii) shall, for the offender's lifetime, register every
year during the month of the offender's birth, during the month that is the
sixth month after the offender's birth month, and also within three business
days of every change of the offender's primary residence, any secondary
residences, place of employment, vehicle information, or educational
information required to be submitted under Subsection (14).
(B)  This registration requirement is not subject to exemptions and may not be
terminated or altered during the offender's lifetime.
(ii)  Offenses referred to in Subsection (12)(c)(i) are:
(A)  any offense listed in Subsection (1)(g) or (n) if, at the time of the
conviction, the offender has previously been convicted of an offense listed in
Subsection (1)(g) or (n) or has previously been required to register as a sex
offender for an offense committed as a juvenile;
(B)  a conviction for any of the following offenses, including attempting,
soliciting, or conspiring to commit any felony of:
(I)  Section 76-5-301.1, child kidnapping, except if the offender is a natural
parent of the victim;
(II)  Section 76-5-402, rape;
(III)  Section 76-5-402.1, rape of a child;
(IV)  Section 76-5-402.2, object rape;
(V)  Section 76-5-402.3, object rape of a child;
(VI)  Section 76-5-403.1, sodomy on a child;
(VII)  Subsection 76-5-404.1(4), aggravated sexual abuse of a child; or
(VIII)  Section 76-5-405, aggravated sexual assault;
(C)  Section 76-4-401, a felony violation of enticing a minor over the
Internet;
(D)  Section 76-5-302, aggravated kidnapping, except if the offender is a
natural parent of the victim;
(E)  Section 76-5-403, forcible sodomy;
(F)  Section 76-5-404.1, sexual abuse of a child; or
(G)  Section 76-5a-3, sexual exploitation of a minor.
(d)  Notwithstanding Subsections (12)(a), (b), and (c), an offender who is
confined in a secure facility or in a state mental hospital is not required to
register during the period of confinement.
(e)  An offender who is required to register under this Subsection (12) shall
surrender the offender's license, certificate, or identification card as
required under Subsection 53-3-216(3) or 53-3-807(4) and may apply for a
license certificate or identification card as provided under Section 53-3-205
or 53-3-804.
(f)  A sex offender who violates Section 77-27-21.8 while required to register
under this section shall register for an additional five years subsequent to
the registration period otherwise required under this section.
(13)  An agency in the state that registers an offender on probation, an
offender who has been released from confinement to parole status or
termination, or an offender whose sentence has expired shall inform the
offender of the duty to comply with:
(a)  the continuing registration requirements of this section during the
period of registration required in Subsection (12), including:
(i)  notification to the state agencies in the states where the registrant
presently resides and plans to reside when moving across state lines;
(ii)  verification of address at least every 60 days pursuant to a parole
agreement for lifetime parolees; and
(iii)  notification to the out-of-state agency where the offender is living,
whether or not the offender is a resident of that state; and
(b)  the driver license certificate or identification card surrender
requirement under Subsection 53-3-216(3) or 53-3-807(4) and application
provisions under Section 53-3-205 or 53-3-804.
(14)  An offender shall provide the department or the registering entity with
the following information:
(a)  all names and aliases by which the offender is or has been known;
(b)  the addresses of the offender's primary and secondary residences;
(c)  a physical description, including the offender's date of birth, height,
weight, eye and hair color;
(d)  the make, model, color, year, plate number, and vehicle identification
number of any vehicle or vehicles the offender owns or regularly drives;
(e)  a current photograph of the offender;
(f)  a set of fingerprints, if one has not already been provided;
(g)  a DNA specimen, taken in accordance with Section 53-10-404, if one has
not already been provided;
(h)  telephone numbers and any other designations used by the offender for
routing or self-identification in telephonic communications from fixed
locations or cellular telephones;
(i)  Internet identifiers and the addresses the offender uses for routing or
self-identification in Internet communications or postings;
(j)  the name and Internet address of all websites on which the sex offender
is registered using an online identifier, including all online identifiers
used to access those websites;
(k)  a copy of the offender's passport, if a passport has been issued to the
offender;
(l)  if the offender is an alien, all documents establishing the offender's
immigration status;
(m)  all professional licenses that authorize the offender to engage in an
occupation or carry out a trade or business, including any identifiers, such
as numbers;
(n)  each educational institution in Utah at which the offender is employed,
carries on a vocation, or is a student, and any change of enrollment or
employment status of the offender at any educational institution;
(o)  the name and the address of any place where the offender is employed or
will be employed;
(p)  the name and the address of any place where the offender works as a
volunteer or will work as a volunteer; and
(q)  the offender's Social Security number.
(15)  The department shall:
(a)  provide the following additional information when available:
(i)  the crimes the offender has been convicted of or adjudicated delinquent
for;
(ii)  a description of the offender's primary and secondary targets; and
(iii)  any other relevant identifying information as determined by the
department;
(b)  maintain the Sex Offender Notification and Registration website; and
(c)  ensure that the registration information collected regarding an
offender's enrollment or employment at an educational institution is:
(i) (A)  promptly made available to any law enforcement agency that has
jurisdiction where the institution is located if the educational institution
is an institution of higher education; or
(B)  promptly made available to the district superintendent of the school
district where the offender is enrolled if the educational institution is an
institution of primary education; and
(ii)  entered into the appropriate state records or data system.
(16) (a)  An offender who knowingly fails to register under this section or
provides false or incomplete information is guilty of:
(i)  a third degree felony and shall be sentenced to serve a term of
incarceration for not less than 90 days and also at least one year of
probation if:
(A)  the offender is required to register for a felony conviction or
adjudicated delinquent for what would be a felony if the juvenile were an
adult of an offense listed in Subsection (1)(g)(i) or (n)(i); or
(B)  the offender is required to register for the offender's lifetime under
Subsection (12)(c); or
(ii)  a class A misdemeanor and shall be sentenced to serve a term of
incarceration for not fewer than 90 days and also at least one year of
probation if the offender is required to register for a misdemeanor conviction
or is adjudicated delinquent for what would be a misdemeanor if the juvenile
were an adult of an offense listed in Subsection (1)(g)(i) or (n)(i).
(b)  Neither the court nor the Board of Pardons and Parole may release a
person who violates this section from serving the term required under
Subsection (16)(a).  This Subsection (16)(b) supersedes any other provision of
the law contrary to this section.
(c)  The offender shall register for an additional year for every year in
which the offender does not comply with the registration requirements of this
section.
(17)  Notwithstanding Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and
Management Act, information under Subsection (15) that is collected and
released under Subsection (27) is public information, unless otherwise
restricted under Subsection (2)(c).
(18) (a)  If an offender is to be temporarily sent outside a secure facility
in which the offender is confined on any assignment, including, without
limitation, firefighting or disaster control, the official who has custody of
the offender shall, within a reasonable time prior to removal from the secure
facility, notify the local law enforcement agencies where the assignment is to
be filled.
(b)  This Subsection (18) does not apply to any person temporarily released
under guard from the institution in which the person is confined.
(19)  Notwithstanding Sections 77-18-9 through 77-18-14 regarding expungement,
a person convicted of any offense listed in Subsection (1)(g) or (n) is not
relieved from the responsibility to register as required under this section.
(20)  Notwithstanding Section 42-1-1, an offender:
(a)  may not change the offender's name:
(i)  while under the jurisdiction of the department; and
(ii)  until the registration requirements of this statute have expired; and
(b)  may not change the offender's name at any time, if registration is for
life under Subsection (12)(c).
(21)  The department may make administrative rules necessary to implement this
section, including:
(a)  the method for dissemination of the information; and
(b)  instructions to the public regarding the use of the information.
(22)  Any information regarding the identity or location of a victim shall be
redacted by the department from information provided under Subsections (14)
and (15).
(23)  This section does not create or impose any duty on any person to request
or obtain information regarding any sex offender from the department.
(24)  The department shall maintain a Sex Offender Notification and
Registration website on the Internet, which shall contain a disclaimer
informing the public:
(a)  the information contained on the site is obtained from offenders and the
department does not guarantee its accuracy or completeness;
(b)  members of the public are not allowed to use the information to harass or
threaten offenders or members of their families; and
(c)  harassment, stalking, or threats against offenders or their families are
prohibited and doing so may violate Utah criminal laws.
(25)  The Sex Offender Notification and Registration website shall be indexed
by both the surname of the offender and by postal codes.
(26)  The department shall construct the Sex Offender Notification and
Registration website so that users, before accessing registry information,
must indicate that they have read the disclaimer, understand it, and agree to
comply with its terms.
(27)  The Sex Offender Notification and Registration website shall include the
following registry information:
(a)  all names and aliases by which the offender is or has been known, but not
including any online or Internet identifiers;
(b)  the addresses of the offender's primary, secondary, and temporary
residences;
(c)  a physical description, including the offender's date of birth, height,
weight, and eye and hair color;
(d)  the make, model, color, year, and plate number of any vehicle or vehicles
the offender owns or regularly drives;
(e)  a current photograph of the offender;
(f)  a list of all professional licenses that authorize the offender to engage
in an occupation or carry out a trade or business;
(g)  each educational institution in Utah at which the offender is employed,
carries on a vocation, or is a student;
(h)  a list of places where the offender works as a volunteer; and
(i)  the crimes listed in Subsections (1)(g) and (1)(n) that the offender has
been convicted of or for which the offender has been adjudicated delinquent in
juvenile court.
(28)  The department, its personnel, and any individual or entity acting at
the request or upon the direction of the department are immune from civil
liability for damages for good faith compliance with this section and will be
presumed to have acted in good faith by reporting information.
(29)  The department shall redact information that, if disclosed, could
reasonably identify a victim.
(30) (a)  Each offender required to register under Subsection (12) shall, in
the month of the offender's birth, pay to the department an annual fee of $100
each year the offender is subject to the registration requirements of this
section.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (30)(a), an offender who is confined in a
secure facility or in a state mental hospital is not required to pay the
annual fee.
(c)  The department shall deposit fees under this Subsection (30) in the
General Fund as a dedicated credit, to be used by the department for
maintaining the offender registry under this section and monitoring offender
registration compliance, including the costs of:
(i)  data entry;
(ii)  processing registration packets;
(iii)  updating registry information;
(iv)  ensuring offender compliance with registration requirements under this
section; and
(v)  apprehending offenders who are in violation of the offender registration
requirements under this section.
(31)  Notwithstanding Subsections (2)(c) and (14)(i) and (j), a sex offender
is not required to provide the department with:
(a)  the offender's online identifier and password used exclusively for the
offender's employment on equipment provided by an employer and used to access
the employer's private network; or
(b)  online identifiers for the offender's financial accounts, including any
bank, retirement, or investment accounts.
